Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

General Provisions

62-1-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Accountancy Act of 1998.”

Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 1; 1998, ch. 700, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 62-101 — 62-145 (Acts 1939, ch. 44, §§ 1-15; 1945, ch. 152, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7097.1-7097.14; Williams, §§ 7097.1-7097.15; Acts 1955, ch. 231, §§ 2-28; Acts 1957, ch. 218, § 1; Acts 1965, ch. 109, §§ 1-8; Acts 1967, ch. 309, § 1; Acts 1971, ch. 161, § 2; Acts 1975, ch. 165, §§ 3-5; Acts 1976, ch. 599, §§ 1-7; ch. 806, §§ 1(1), (2); Acts 1977, ch. 211, § 1; Acts 1978, ch. 906, §§ 6, 8; ch. 924, § 3; 1980, ch. 451, § 1), concerning accountants, was repealed by Acts 1955, ch. 231, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 7; and 1980, ch. 518, § 20.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Occupation tax on accountants, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Revocation or denial for child support enforcement, title 36, ch. 5, part 7.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, § 7.

62-1-102. Legislative intent.

It is the policy of this state, and the purpose of this chapter, to promote the reliability of information that is used for guidance in financial transactions or for accounting for or assessing the financial status or performance of commercial, noncommercial and governmental enterprises. The public interest requires that persons professing special competence in accountancy or offering assurance as to the reliability or fairness of presentation of such information shall have demonstrated their qualifications to do so and that persons who have not demonstrated and maintained such qualifications not be permitted to represent themselves as having such special competence or to offer such assurance, that the conduct of persons licensed as having special competence in accountancy be regulated in all aspects of their professional work, that a public authority competent to prescribe and assess the qualifications and to regulate the conduct of licensees be established, and that the use of titles that have a capacity or tendency to deceive the public as to the status or competence of the persons using such titles be prohibited.

Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 2; 1987, ch. 351, § 9; 1997, ch. 68, § 1; 1998, ch. 700, § 1.

62-1-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Attest” means providing the following services:

Any audit or other engagement to be performed in accordance with the Statements on Auditing Standards (SAS);

Any review to be performed in accordance with the Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services (SSARS);

Any examination to be performed in accordance with the Statements on Standards for Attestation Engagements (SSAE);

The issuance of any report, including compilation reports, prescribed by the SASs, the SSARSs or the SSAEs on any services to which those statements on standards apply, indicating that the service was performed in accordance with standards established by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants (AICPA); and

The statements on standards specified in this subdivision (1) shall be adopted by reference by the board pursuant to rulemaking and shall be those developed for general application by recognized national accountancy organizations such as the AICPA;

“Board” means the state board of accountancy established under § 62-1-104 or its predecessor under prior law;

“Certificate” means a certificate as certified public accountant issued under §§ 62-1-106 and 62-1-107 or corresponding provisions of prior law, or a corresponding certificate as certified public accountant issued after examination under the law of any other state;

“Certified public accountant (CPA)” means a person holding a certificate issued under §§ 62-1-106 and 62-1-107;

“Client” means a person or entity that agrees to receive any professional service from a licensee;

“CPA firm” and “PA firm” means a sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership or any other form of organization issued a permit under § 62-1-108;

“License” means a certificate issued under § 62-1-107, a permit issued under § 62-1-108 or a registration under § 62-1-109, or, in each case, a certificate, license or permit issued under corresponding provisions of prior law;

“Licensee” means the holder of a license;

“Manager” means a manager of a limited liability company;

“Member” means a member of a limited liability company;

“Peer review” means a study, appraisal or review of one (1) or more aspects of the professional work of a CPA firm that performs attest services by a qualified person or persons who hold certificates and who are not affiliated with the CPA firm being reviewed;

“Permit” means a permit to practice as a CPA firm issued under § 62-1-108 or corresponding provisions of prior law or under corresponding provisions of the laws of other states;

“Professional” means arising out of or related to the specialized knowledge or skills associated with CPAs;

“Public accountant” means a person holding a registration issued under § 62-1-109;

“Registration” means the registration issued to a public accountant under § 62-1-109 and includes the licenses issued to public accountants under prior law;

“Report,” when used with reference to attest services, means an opinion, report or other form of language that states or implies assurance as to the reliability of any financial statements or assertion. “Report” also includes any statement or implication that the person or firm issuing it has special knowledge or competence in accounting or auditing and that the service reported upon was performed under standards for such services established by the AICPA. The statement or implication of special knowledge or competence may arise from use by the issuer of the report of names or titles indicating that the person or firm is an accountant or auditor or from the language of the report itself;

“Rule” means any rule, regulation or other written directive of general application duly adopted by the board in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5;

“State” means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands and Guam, except that “this state” means the state of Tennessee; and

“Substantial equivalency” is a determination by the board of accountancy or its designee that the education, examination and experience requirements contained in the statutes and administrative rules of another jurisdiction are comparable to or exceed the education, examination and experience requirements contained in this chapter or that an individual CPA's education, examination and experience qualifications are comparable to or exceed the education, examination and experience requirements contained in this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 3; 1987, ch. 351, § 10; 1989, ch. 443, § 1; 1994, ch. 674, §§ 3, 4; 1997, ch. 68, § 2; 1998, ch. 700, § 1.

62-1-104. State board of accountancy — Creation — Membership — Terms.

There is created a state board of accountancy.

The board shall be composed of eleven (11) members appointed by the governor.

Nine (9) of the members shall be certified public accountants holding a certificate issued by, and residing in, this state.

Appointments of certified public accountants to the board shall be made in a manner so as to provide equal representation from each of the three (3) grand divisions of this state.

One (1) member shall be an attorney licensed to practice in the highest court of the state.

One (1) member shall be a public member possessing expertise in one (1) or more significant portions of the board's regulated activities.

Neither the attorney nor the public member shall be the holder of a certified public accountant's certificate or a license to practice as a public accountant.

The public member must be a resident of this state and have reached the age of majority prior to appointment.

Certified public accountants shall be appointed to the board by the governor from a list of qualified certified public accountants submitted by the Tennessee Society of Certified Public Accountants.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

Each board member's term shall be for three (3) years.

Members of the board shall not be eligible to serve more than three (3) successive complete terms.

Vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

Upon expiration of a member's term of office, the member shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed.

The governor shall remove from the board any member for neglect of duty or other just cause.

Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 4; 1988, ch. 1013, § 26; 1989, ch. 443, § 2; 1997, ch. 68, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The state board of accountancy, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2026. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-247.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

62-1-105. Board officers — Meetings — Procedure — Records — Executive director — Rules — Promotion of improved accounting standards.

The board shall elect a chair, vice chair and secretary annually from its members. A quorum for the transaction of board business shall consist of a majority of the members. The board shall meet at such places within the state and at such times that are required for the proper administration of this chapter. Members of the board shall be given reasonable notice of each regular or special meeting of the board.

The board shall, by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of its members, adopt rules of procedure governing the conduct of matters before the board. The board shall, before April 30 of each year, publish and make available a roster of all certified public accountants, all public accountants, all holders of valid permits to practice and all currently registered offices. The board may also publish from time to time reports on the activities of the board, including information it deems relevant to the public interest. The board shall maintain an accurate record of all proceedings before the board, including, but not limited to, minutes detailing what transpired and action taken at board meetings, records of all complaints received, whether oral or written and disposition of each complaint, specific reasons for denials of applicants to become certified or licensed and reasons for revocations, suspensions and other disciplinary actions taken by the board.

The board shall have an executive director, who shall be appointed by the board, and compensation for the executive director shall be established by the board. The board shall retain and establish the qualifications and compensation for investigators and other staff requiring professional qualifications. The executive director and all members of the board's staff requiring professional qualifications shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The board shall determine annually in advance its expenditures for equipment, peer review and other professional programs and participation in the activities of the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy. The expenditures so established, together with all other expenses of the board, shall be budgeted by the board not to exceed the fees received by the board, including the accrual of fees previously received. The commissioner of finance and administration shall inform the board annually, for budgeting purposes, the allocation of overhead to the board. The executive director of the board shall have an adequate staff, including part-time personnel, as determined by the board and shall be responsible for the daily operations of the board, including, but not limited to:

Maintenance and security of all necessary records and files;

Ensuring adequate meeting space for board meetings;

Implementation of board policies and procedures;

Informing the board as to state policies and procedures; and

Any other matters delegated by the board.

Any expenditure by the board under this section shall be subject to approval by the commissioner of finance and administration, pursuant to the board's annual budget submitted to the commissioner of commerce and insurance and approved by the commissioner of finance and administration.

The board may appoint committees from within or without the board, which shall be compensated in the manner provided in this chapter.

The board may adopt rules governing its administration and enforcement of this chapter and the conduct of licensees, including, but not limited to:

Rules governing the board's meetings and the conduct of its business;

Rules of procedure governing the conduct of investigations and hearings by the board;

Rules specifying the educational and experience qualifications required for the issuance of certificates under § 62-1-107 and the continuing professional education required for renewal of certificates under § 62-1-107;

Rules of professional conduct directed to controlling the quality and probity of services by licensees and dealing, among other things, with independence, integrity and objectivity, competence and technical standards, responsibilities to the public, and responsibilities to clients;

Rules governing the manner and circumstances of use of the titles “certified public accountant” and “CPA”;

Rules regarding peer review that may be required to be performed under this chapter;

Rules on substantial equivalence to implement § 62-1-117;

Rules setting fees, including late fees, for examination, reexamination, certification, licensure, certificate renewal, licensure renewal, registration, registration renewal, peer review and other necessary fees; and

Other rules that the board may deem necessary or appropriate for implementing the provisions and the purposes of this chapter.

The board shall join professional organizations and associations to promote the improvement of the standards of the practice of accounting and for the protection and welfare of the public. In order to be informed about the operations and practices of other boards of accountancy desiring reciprocal exchange and in order to be advised regarding the progress of accountancy throughout the country and to promote uniformity in the regulation of accountancy, the board, executive director and staff shall, at the discretion of the board, travel and attend national and regional meetings of the National Association of State Boards of Accountancy (NASBA) and other appropriate professional meetings at the expense of the board. Travel shall be subject to and in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 5; 1984, ch. 676, § 5; 1989, ch. 443, § 3; 1992, ch. 960, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 674, §§ 5, 6; 1995, ch. 424, § 1; 1998, ch. 700, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 65, § 1; 2002, ch. 654, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 595, § 1.

Cross-References. Per diem and travel expenses of members, § 56-1-307.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 62-1-105 gives the board of accountancy the sole authority to hire and terminate its executive director and any other member of its staff requiring professional qualifications, OAG 04-060, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 58 (4/08/04).

State board of accountancy's authority to establish compensation for employees. OAG 11-70, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 72 (9/16/11).

62-1-106. Requirements for certification as certified public accountant.

The certificate of certified public accountant shall be granted to persons of good moral character who meet the education, experience and examination requirements of subsections (b)-(g) and who make application for the certificate pursuant to § 62-1-107.

“Good moral character” for purposes of this section means lack of a history of dishonest or felonious acts.

The education requirement for a certificate that must be met before an applicant is eligible to receive the certificate described in § 62-1-107 shall be at least one hundred fifty (150) semester hours of college education, including a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university acceptable to the board, the total educational program to include an accounting concentration or equivalent as determined by board rule to be appropriate.

The board may admit to the examination prescribed in subsection (d) any candidate who has completed a baccalaureate or higher degree conferred by a college or university acceptable to the board, the total educational program to include an accounting concentration or equivalent as determined by board rule to be appropriate.

The board may report the results of an examination to the applicant before the educational requirements established by this subsection (c) have been completed, but in no event shall an applicant be eligible for a certificate until the applicant has:

Completed the educational requirements set forth in subdivision (c)(1); and

Passed the examination required by subsection (d).

The examination required to be passed as a condition for the granting of a certificate shall be held at least twice a year and shall test the applicant's knowledge of the subjects of accounting and auditing and other related subjects that the board may specify by rule, including, but not limited to, business law and taxation. The time for holding the examination shall be determined by the board and may be changed from time to time. The board shall prescribe by rule the methods of applying for and conducting the examination, including methods for grading papers and determining a passing grade required of an applicant for a certificate; provided, that the board shall, to the extent possible, see to it that the examination itself, grading of the examination and the passing grades are uniform with those applicable in all other states. The board may make such use of all or any part of the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination and Advisory Grading Service of the AICPA and may contract with third parties to perform such administrative services with respect to the examination as it deems appropriate to assist it in performing its duties under this chapter.

The board may charge each applicant an examination fee or authorize a third party administering the examination to charge each applicant an examination fee in an amount prescribed by the board.

An applicant for initial issuance of a certificate under this section shall show that the applicant has had one (1) year of experience. This experience shall include providing any type of service or advice involving the use of accounting, attest, management advisory, financial advisory, tax or consulting skills, all of which were verified by a licensee. This experience will be acceptable if it is gained through employment in government, industry, academia or public practice.

All persons holding a valid certificate as a certified public accountant issued by this state prior to October 1, 1998, shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this section.

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 4; 2000, ch. 609, § 1; 2002, ch. 654, §§ 4, 5; 2007, ch. 19, § 4; 2009, ch. 26, § 1; 2016, ch. 595, § 2.

62-1-107. Certificates — Issuance and renewal — Fees — Certification of accountants certified in other states — Certification of holders of equivalent foreign designations.

The board shall grant or renew certificates to persons who make application and demonstrate that:

Their qualifications, including, where applicable, the qualifications prescribed by § 62-1-106, are in accordance with subsections (b)-(i); or

They are eligible under the substantial equivalency standard set out in § 62-1-117 that requires licensure for those CPAs who establish their principal office in another state.

The holder of a certificate issued under this section may only provide attest services in a CPA firm that holds a permit issued under § 62-1-108.

Certificates shall be initially issued and renewed for periods of no more than two (2) years. Every holder of a certificate as a certified public accountant or a registration as a public accountant shall be required to renew the certificate or registration biennially. Biennial renewal dates may be set by the board at its discretion. The renewal process established by the board may include procedures for odd-numbered certificates and registrations to be renewed within two (2) years from the date of issuance on odd-numbered years and even-numbered certificates and registrations to be renewed within two (2) years from the date of issuance on even-numbered years. The board shall set the biennial renewal fee. All certificates and registrations issued by the board and any holder of a certificate or registration shall relinquish the certificate or registration to the board within thirty (30) days after the certificate or registration has been suspended or revoked.

With regard to applicants who do not qualify for reciprocity under the substantial equivalency standard set out in § 62-1-117, the board shall issue a certificate to a licensee of another state upon a showing that:

The applicant passed the examination required for issuance of the applicant's certificate with grades that would have been passing grades at the time in this state;

The applicant had four (4) years of experience of the type described in § 62-1-106(f) or meets equivalent requirements prescribed by the board by rule after passing the examination upon which the applicant's certificate was based and within the ten (10) years immediately preceding the application; and

If the applicant's license was issued more than four (4) years prior to the application for issuance of an initial certificate under this section, the applicant has fulfilled the requirements of continuing professional education that would have been applicable under subsection (d).

As an alternative to the requirements of subdivision (c)(1), a licensee of another state who desires to establish the licensee's principal place of business in this state shall request the issuance of a certificate from the board prior to establishing the principal place of business. The board shall issue a certificate to such a person who obtains from the board or its designee verification that the individual's CPA qualifications are substantially equivalent to the CPA licensure requirements of this chapter.

For renewal of a certificate under this section, each licensee shall participate in a program of learning designed to maintain professional competency. The program of learning must comply with rules adopted by the board. The requirements established by the board shall prescribe regulations requiring continuing education of eighty (80) credit hours over a two-year period, with a minimum of twenty (20) credit hours in each year as a prerequisite for the renewal of a certificate. The board may by rule create an exception to this requirement for certificate holders who do not perform or offer to perform for the public one (1) or more kinds of services involving the use of accounting or auditing skills, including issuance of reports on financial statements or of one (1) or more kinds of management advisory, financial advisory or consulting services, or the preparation of tax returns or the furnishing of advice on tax matters. Licensees granted such an exception by the board must place the word “inactive” adjacent to their CPA title or PA title on any business card, letterhead or any other document or device, with the exception of their CPA certificate or PA registration, on which their CPA or PA title appears.

The board shall charge a fee for each application for initial issuance or renewal of a certificate under this section in an amount prescribed by the board. The board, by rule, may not require inactive licensees sixty-five (65) years of age or older, disabled persons who are unable to practice accountancy for a period of time and persons in active military service to pay a renewal fee.

Applicants for initial issuance or renewal of certificates under this section shall in their applications list all states in which they have applied for or hold licenses and list any past denial, revocation or suspension of a license; and each holder of or applicant for a certificate under this section shall notify the board in writing, within thirty (30) days after its occurrence, of any issuance, denial, revocation or suspension of a license by another state, change of address or employment or any conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction of a felony.

The board shall issue a certificate to a holder of a substantially equivalent foreign designation; provided, that:

The foreign authority that granted the designation makes similar provision to allow a person who holds a valid certificate issued by this state to obtain the foreign authority's comparable designation;

The foreign designation:

Was duly issued by a foreign authority that regulates the practice of public accountancy and the foreign designation has not expired or been revoked or suspended;

Entitles the holder to issue reports upon financial statements; and

Was issued upon the basis of educational, examination and experience requirements established by the foreign authority or by law; and

The applicant:

Received the designation based on educational and examination standards substantially equivalent to those in effect in this state at the time the foreign designation was granted;

Completed an experience requirement substantially equivalent to the requirement set out in § 62-1-106(f) in the jurisdiction that granted the foreign designation or has completed four (4) years of professional experience in this state or meets equivalent requirements prescribed by the board by rule within the ten (10) years immediately preceding the application; and

Passed a uniform qualifying examination in national standards and an examination on the laws, regulations and code of ethical conduct in effect in this state acceptable to the board.

An applicant under subsection (g) shall in the application list all jurisdictions, foreign and domestic, in which the applicant has applied for or holds a designation to practice public accountancy; and each holder of a certificate issued under this subsection (h) shall notify the board in writing, within thirty (30) days after its occurrence, of any issuance, denial, revocation or suspension of a designation or commencement of a disciplinary or enforcement action by any jurisdiction or any conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction of a felony.

The board has the sole authority to interpret the application of subsections (g) and (h).

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 4; 1999, ch. 65, §§ 2-4; 2002, ch. 654, §§ 6, 7; 2018, ch. 551, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-1-107 (Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 7; 1987, ch. 351, §§ 12, 13; 1989, ch. 443, §§ 5, 6; 1994, ch. 674, § 10; 1997, ch. 68, § 4), concerning disciplinary powers of board, notice and hearing and reinstatement procedures, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 700, effective October 1, 1998.

Acts 2018, ch. 551, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to license renewals occurring on or after March 9, 2018.

62-1-108. CPA firms — Permits — Issuance and renewal — Non-licensee owners — Fees.

The board shall grant or renew permits to practice as a CPA firm or PA firm to entities that make application and demonstrate their qualifications for the permits in accordance with subsections (b)-(i) or to CPA firms originally licensed in another state that establish an office in this state. A firm with multiple locations shall obtain a permit for each location. A firm must hold a permit issued under this section in order to provide attest services or to use the title “CPAs,” “CPA firm,” “PAs” or “PA firm.”

Permits shall be initially issued and renewed for periods of not more than two (2) years but, in any event, expiring on December 31 following issuance or renewal. Applications for permits shall be made in the form and, in the case of applications for renewal, between the dates that the board may specify by rule.

An applicant for initial issuance or renewal of a permit to practice under this section shall be required to show that:

Notwithstanding any other law, a simple majority of the beneficial ownership of the firm, in terms of financial interests in the equity capital and voting rights held by all partners, officers, shareholders, members or managers, belongs to holders of a certificate who are licensed in some state, and such partners, officers, shareholders, members or managers, whose principal place of business is in this state, and who perform professional services in this state hold a valid certificate issued under § 62-1-107 or the corresponding provision of prior law or are public accountants registered under § 62-1-109. Although firms may include nonlicensee owners, the firms must be controlled by holders of a certificate who are licensed by some state and the control may not be relinquished by contract through the issuance of minority veto rights or otherwise. The firm and its ownership must comply with rules promulgated by the board;

Any individual licensee who is responsible for supervising attest services and signs or authorizes someone to sign the accountants' report on the financial statements on behalf of the firm shall meet the experience requirements set out in the professional standards for those services; and

Any individual licensee who signs or authorizes someone to sign the accountants' report on the financial statements on behalf of the firm shall meet the experience requirement of subdivision (c)(2).

Any CPA firm may include nonlicensee owners; provided, that:

The firm designates a Tennessee licensee/owner to provide the board with the names and amounts of equitable ownership and voting rights of all CPAs and other owners practicing in this state and the name of the resident manager of each office in this state;

All nonlicensee owners are active individual participants in the CPA firm or affiliated entities; and

The firm complies with other requirements that the board may impose by rule.

An applicant for initial issuance or renewal of a permit to practice under this section shall be required to obtain a permit for each location of the firm within this state with the board and to show that all attest services rendered in this state are under the charge of a person holding a valid certificate issued under § 62-1-107 or the corresponding provision of prior law or some other state law.

The board shall charge a fee for each application for initial issuance or renewal of a permit under this section in an amount prescribed by the board. The board has the authority to establish late fees for any applications, renewals or reports that are filed late.

An applicant for initial issuance or renewal of permits under this section shall in the application list all states in which the applicant has applied for or hold permits as CPA firms and list any past denial, revocation or suspension of a permit by any other state; and each holder of or applicant for a permit under this section shall notify the board in writing, within thirty (30) days after its occurrence, of any change in the identities of partners, officers, shareholders, members or managers whose principal place of business is in this state, any change in the number or location of offices within this state, any change in the identity of the persons in charge of those offices and any issuance, denial, revocation or suspension of a permit by any other state.

Firms that fall out of compliance with the section due to changes in firm ownership or personnel after receiving or renewing a permit shall take corrective action to bring the firm back into compliance. The board may grant a reasonable period of time for a firm to take corrective action. Failure to bring the firm back into compliance within a reasonable period as defined by the board will result in the suspension or revocation of the firm permit.

All firms holding a valid permit to practice as a CPA firm or PA firm issued by this state prior to October 1, 1998, shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this section.

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 4; 1999, ch. 65, § 5; 2002, ch. 654, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-1-108 (Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 8; 1987, ch. 141, § 1; 1987, ch. 351, § 19; 1988, ch. 606, §§ 1-3; 1989, ch. 443, §§ 7-10; 1990, ch. 927, § 1; 1991, ch. 199, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 251, § 1; 1994, ch. 674, §§ 11-13), concerning certified public accountants, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 700, effective October 1, 1998.

Attorney General Opinions. A licensed accountant or accounting firm is not prohibited from employing a full or part-time licensed real estate appraiser or registered taxpayer's agent, OAG 02-029, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 30 (3/14/02).

62-1-109. Persons certified under prior law.

Persons who on October 1, 1998, held licenses as public accountants issued under prior law of this state shall be entitled to have their registrations renewed upon fulfillment of the continuing professional education requirements for renewal of certificates set out in § 62-1-107 and on the renewal cycle and payment of fees there prescribed for renewal of certificates. Any registration not so renewed shall expire three (3) years after October 1, 1998. Firms of public accountants holding permits to practice as firms of public accountants issued under prior law of this state shall be entitled to have their permits to practice renewed pursuant to the procedures and subject to the requirements for renewal of permits to practice for firms of certified public accountants set out in § 62-1-108. So long as the public accountant licensees hold valid registrations and permits to practice, they shall be entitled to perform attest services to the same extent as holders of certificates and other holders of permits, and, in addition, they shall be entitled to use the title “public accountants” and “PA,” but no other title. The holder of a registration issued under this section may only perform attest services in a firm that holds a permit issued under § 62-1-108.

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-1-109 (Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 9; 1987, ch. 334, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 606, §§ 4-6; 1989, ch. 443, §§ 11-19; 1990, ch. 927, § 2; 1994, ch. 674, § 14; 1997, ch. 68, § 5), concerning public accountants, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 700, effective October 1, 1998.

62-1-110. Appointment of secretary of state as agent for process.

Application by a person or a firm not a resident of this state for a certificate under § 62-1-107 or a permit to practice under § 62-1-108 shall constitute appointment of the secretary of state as the applicant's agent upon whom process may be served in any action or proceeding against the applicant arising out of any transaction or operation connected with or incidental to services performed by the applicant while a licensee within this state.

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-1-110 (Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 10; 1987, ch. 351, §§ 3-5, 14; 1989, ch. 523, § 104; 1994, ch. 674, §§ 15, 16), concerning renewal of permit, certificate, or license accountants, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 700, effective October 1, 1998.